Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Chapter 60. Mortgage Licensing.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 88(a), ch. 61, SLA 2010, provides that “[a] person holding a valid license issued under former AS 06.60 [before the amendment of the chapter by provisions of ch. 61, SLA 2010], on or before July 1, 2010, may continue to operate under that license until the license expires, is revoked, or is suspended, and, except as provided by (c) of this section, [ch. 61, SLA 2010], including its provisions on expiration, renewal, prohibitions, revocation, suspension, and enforcement, applies to the license and to the person’s operation under the license.”
For text of the exception provided for “by (c) of this section,” see the editor’s note following AS

06.60.027

.

Section 88(b), ch. 61, SLA 2010, provides that “[a] person who is not licensed under former AS 06.60 [before the amendment of the chapter by provisions of ch. 61, SLA 2010] before July 1, 2010, and files an application for licensing under [ch. 61, SLA 2010] on or after July 1, 2010, shall comply with the requirements of [ch. 61, SLA 2010] to receive a license under [ch. 61, SLA 2010].”